Montana, session 2025, HB412.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Exemption for modifications to residential property. (1) There is an
exemption for modifying class four residential property to add living space to an existing residential structure as
provided in this section. A modification may include increasing the finished area of a building or altering the
structure or form of an existing space.
(2) (a) Except as provided in subsections (2)(b) through (2)(d), the exemption in each year is equal
to the lesser of the amount by which the modification increases the market value of the property in the year in
which the market value first includes the modification or 15% of the market value in the year before the
modification is included in the market value of the property.
(b) An exemption is not allowed for a modification made within 3 years of construction of a new
class four residential property.
(c) Only one exemption for modification may be granted within a 6-year period.
(d) The exemption under this section terminates on sale of the property.
(3) The department shall automatically grant the exemption provided for in this section beginning
in the first tax year that the market value includes the modification of the property. The exemption may not be
granted for a year before the department includes the modification in the market value of the property.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Administer within existing resources. The department of revenue
shall administer the exemption provided for in [section 1] within existing resources.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 412

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 412.1

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 15, chapter 6, part 2, and the provisions of Title 15, chapter 6, part 2, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Applicability. [This act] applies to property tax years beginning after
December 31, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 412